Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is  appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $153,793,142.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$353,390,232 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses for operations, from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscel-
laneous Receipts and federal funds from  the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development for contract services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not de-
scribed in this section, collected or received by the  Housing and Community Services De-
partment.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$30,269,740 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to  the Housing and Community Services Department for lottery
bonds.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$437,717,346 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal  funds other than those described in sections 2 and 6 of this
2021 Act collected or received by the Housing and Community Services Department.
SECTION 5. There is  appropriated to the Housing and Community Services Department,
for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $50,273,038
for debt service for bond-related activities.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of $1 is
established for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment of
expenses from  fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal
funds from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in this section, collected
or received by the Housing and Community Services Department, for debt service and related
costs for outstanding general obligation bonds sold pursuant to  Article XI-Q of the Oregon
Constitution.
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2021, expenditures by the Housing and
Community Services Department for the following are not limited:
(1) Payments for costs resulting from the sale and issuance or redemption of  bonds is-
sued under ORS 287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650 (2005 Edition).
(2) Payment of debt service  and redemption premium on bonds issued under ORS
287A.360, 456.519, 456.645 and 456.650  (2005 Edition) and payments for the purchase of bonds
as provided in ORS 456.680.
(3) Loans and payments for purchasing, insuring and servicing loans  as provided in ORS
456.625, 456.627, 456.635, 456.690, 456.705, 456.715  and 456.717 and payments for the purchase
from lending institutions of securities backed  by residential loans as provided in ORS 456.635
(1).
(4) Advances for development costs made in accordance with ORS 456.710.
(5) Pass-through payments of federal rent subsidy moneys from the United  States De-
partment of Housing and Urban Development.
(6) Payments for costs associated with asset protection.
SECTION 8.
(1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2021, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $10,000,000 to be allocated to the Housing and Community  Services De-
partment for development of affordable rental housing projects  that are colocated with child
care or early learning centers.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2022, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 9. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by House June 22, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5011 (HB 5011-A) Page 2